Maine, session 132, LD751.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12051, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 172, §1, is
amended to read:
D. Notwithstanding paragraph C, until May 1, 2025, in those portions of Washington
County and Hancock County that are situated south of Route 9, a resident may train up
to 6 dogs at any one time on bear from July 1st to the 4th day preceding the open season
on hunting bear except that permission is required to train dogs on land used for wild
blueberry production.
This paragraph is repealed May 1, 2025.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR2431(02)